Illinois, session 104th, HB2485.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Section 8-2 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/8-2)  (from Ch. 43, par. 159)7    Sec. 8-2. Payments; reports. It is the duty of each 8manufacturer with respect to alcoholic liquor produced or 9imported by such manufacturer, or purchased tax-free by such 10manufacturer from another manufacturer or importing 11distributor, and of each importing distributor as to alcoholic 12liquor purchased by such importing distributor from foreign 13importers or from anyone from any point in the United States 14outside of this State or purchased tax-free from another 15manufacturer or importing distributor, to pay the tax imposed 16by Section 8-1 to the Department of Revenue on or before the 1715th day of the calendar month following the calendar month in 18which such alcoholic liquor is sold or used by such 19manufacturer or by such importing distributor other than in an 20authorized tax-free manner or to pay that tax electronically 21as provided in this Section.22    Each manufacturer and each importing distributor shall 23make payment under one of the following methods: (1) on or   HB2485- 2 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1before the 15th day of each calendar month, file in person or 2by United States first-class mail, postage pre-paid, with the 3Department of Revenue, on forms prescribed and furnished by 4the Department, a report in writing in such form as may be 5required by the Department in order to compute, and assure the 6accuracy of, the tax due on all taxable sales and uses of 7alcoholic liquor occurring during the preceding month. Payment 8of the tax in the amount disclosed by the report shall 9accompany the report or, (2) on or before the 15th day of each 10calendar month, electronically file with the Department of 11Revenue, on forms prescribed and furnished by the Department, 12an electronic report in such form as may be required by the 13Department in order to compute, and assure the accuracy of, 14the tax due on all taxable sales and uses of alcoholic liquor 15occurring during the preceding month. An electronic payment of 16the tax in the amount disclosed by the report shall accompany 17the report. A manufacturer or distributor who files an 18electronic report and electronically pays the tax imposed 19pursuant to Section 8-1 to the Department of Revenue on or 20before the 15th day of the calendar month following the 21calendar month in which such alcoholic liquor is sold or used 22by that manufacturer or importing distributor other than in an 23authorized tax-free manner shall pay to the Department the 24amount of the tax imposed pursuant to Section 8-1, less a 25discount which is allowed to reimburse the manufacturer or 26importing distributor for the expenses incurred in keeping and   HB2485- 3 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1maintaining records, preparing and filing the electronic 2returns, remitting the tax, and supplying data to the 3Department upon request.4    The discount shall be in an amount as follows:5        (1) For original returns due on or after January 1, 6    2003 through September 30, 2003, the discount shall be 7    1.75% or $1,250 per return, whichever is less;8        (2) For original returns due on or after October 1, 9    2003 through September 30, 2004, the discount shall be 2% 10    or $3,000 per return, whichever is less; and11        (3) For original returns due on or after October 1, 12    2004, the discount shall be 2% or $2,000 per return, 13    whichever is less.14    The Department may, if it deems it necessary in order to 15insure the payment of the tax imposed by this Article, require 16returns to be made more frequently than and covering periods 17of less than a month. Such return shall contain such further 18information as the Department may reasonably require.19    It shall be presumed that all alcoholic liquors acquired 20or made by any importing distributor or manufacturer have been 21sold or used by him in this State and are the basis for the tax 22imposed by this Article unless proven, to the satisfaction of 23the Department, that such alcoholic liquors are (1) still in 24the possession of such importing distributor or manufacturer, 25or (2) prior to the termination of possession have been lost by 26theft or through unintentional destruction, or (3) that such   HB2485- 4 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1alcoholic liquors are otherwise exempt from taxation under 2this Act.3    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 4manufacturer's or importing distributor's liabilities under 5this Act, as shown on an original report, the manufacturer or 6importing distributor may credit such excess payment against 7liability subsequently to be remitted to the Department under 8this Act, in accordance with reasonable rules adopted by the 9Department. If the Department subsequently determines that all 10or any part of the credit taken was not actually due to the 11manufacturer or importing distributor, the manufacturer's or 12importing distributor's discount shall be reduced by an amount 13equal to the difference between the discount as applied to the 14credit taken and that actually due, and the manufacturer or 15importing distributor shall be liable for penalties and 16interest on such difference. 17    The Department may require any foreign importer to file 18monthly information returns, by the 15th day of the month 19following the month which any such return covers, if the 20Department determines this to be necessary to the proper 21performance of the Department's functions and duties under 22this Act. Such return shall contain such information as the 23Department may reasonably require.24    Every manufacturer and importing distributor, except for a 25manufacturer or importing distributor who is applying for a 26manufacturer's or importing distributor's license under this   HB2485- 5 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1Act for the first time or a manufacturer or importing 2distributor who that in the preceding year had less than 3$50,000 of tax liability under this Article, shall also file, 4with the Department, a bond in an amount not less than $1,000 5and not to exceed $100,000 on a form to be approved by, and 6with a surety or sureties satisfactory to, the Department. 7Such bond may be required as a condition to renew a license for 8subsequent annual license terms if a manufacturer or importing 9distributor exceeds $50,000 in tax liability. Such bond shall 10be conditioned upon the manufacturer or importing distributor 11paying to the Department all monies becoming due from such 12manufacturer or importing distributor under this Article. The 13Department shall fix the penalty of such bond in each case, 14taking into consideration the amount of alcoholic liquor 15expected to be sold and used by such manufacturer or importing 16distributor, and the penalty fixed by the Department shall be 17sufficient, in the Department's opinion, to protect the State 18of Illinois against failure to pay any amount due under this 19Article, but the amount of the penalty fixed by the Department 20shall not exceed twice the amount of tax liability of a monthly 21return, nor shall the amount of such penalty be less than 22$1,000. The Department shall notify the State Commission of 23the Department's approval or disapproval of any such 24manufacturer's or importing distributor's bond, or of the 25termination or cancellation of any such bond, or of the 26Department's direction to a manufacturer or importing   HB2485- 6 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1distributor that he must file additional bond in order to 2comply with this Section. The Commission shall not renew issue 3a license for to any applicant for a manufacturer's or 4importing distributor's license if unless the Commission has 5received a notification from the Department showing that such 6applicant is required to file and has not filed a satisfactory 7bond with the Department hereunder and that such bond has not 8been approved by the Department. Failure by any licensed 9manufacturer or importing distributor to keep a satisfactory 10bond in effect with the Department or to furnish additional 11bond to the Department, when required hereunder by the 12Department to do so, shall be grounds for the revocation or 13suspension of such manufacturer's or importing distributor's 14license by the Commission. If a manufacturer or importing 15distributor fails to pay any amount due under this Article, 16his bond with the Department shall be deemed forfeited, and 17the Department may institute a suit in its own name on such 18bond.19    After notice and opportunity for a hearing the State 20Commission may revoke or suspend the license of any 21manufacturer or importing distributor who fails to comply with 22the provisions of this Section. Notice of such hearing and the 23time and place thereof shall be in writing and shall contain a 24statement of the charges against the licensee. Such notice may 25be given by United States registered or certified mail with 26return receipt requested, addressed to the person concerned at   HB2485- 7 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1his last known address and shall be given not less than 7 days 2prior to the date fixed for the hearing. An order revoking or 3suspending a license under the provisions of this Section may 4be reviewed in the manner provided in Section 7-10 of this Act. 5No new license shall be granted to a person whose license has 6been revoked for a violation of this Section or, in case of 7suspension, shall such suspension be terminated until he has 8paid to the Department all taxes and penalties which he owes 9the State under the provisions of this Act.10    Every manufacturer or importing distributor who has, as 11verified by the Department, continuously complied with the 12conditions of the bond under this Act for a period of 2 years 13shall be considered to be a prior continuous compliance 14taxpayer. In determining the consecutive period of time for 15qualification as a prior continuous compliance taxpayer, any 16consecutive period of time of qualifying compliance 17immediately prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act 18of 1987 shall be credited to any manufacturer or importing 19distributor.20    A manufacturer or importing distributor that is a prior 21continuous compliance taxpayer under this Section and becomes 22a successor as the result of an acquisition, merger, or 23consolidation of a manufacturer or importing distributor shall 24be deemed to be a prior continuous compliance taxpayer with 25respect to the acquired, merged, or consolidated entity. 26    Every prior continuous compliance taxpayer shall be exempt   HB2485- 8 -LRB104 10427 RPS 20502 b1from the bond requirements of this Act until the Department 2has determined the taxpayer to be delinquent in the filing of 3any return or deficient in the payment of any tax under this 4Act. Any taxpayer who fails to pay an admitted or established 5liability under this Act may also be required to post bond or 6other acceptable security with the Department guaranteeing the 7payment of such admitted or established liability.8    The Department shall discharge any surety and shall 9release and return any bond or security deposit assigned, 10pledged or otherwise provided to it by a taxpayer under this 11Section within 30 days after: (1) such taxpayer becomes a 12prior continuous compliance taxpayer; or (2) such taxpayer has 13ceased to collect receipts on which he is required to remit tax 14to the Department, has filed a final tax return, and has paid 15to the Department an amount sufficient to discharge his 16remaining tax liability as determined by the Department under 17this Act.18(Source: P.A. 100-1171, eff. 1-4-19; 101-37, eff. 7-3-19.)